Utah statutes.
48-2c-1211 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Procedure for judicial dissolution.

(1) (a)  A proceeding by the attorney general or director of the division to dissolve a company shall be brought in:

(i)  the district court of the county in this state in which the principal office is located; or

(ii)  if it has no principal office in this state, the district court of Salt Lake County.

(b)  A proceeding brought by any other party named in Section 48-2c-1210 shall be brought in the district court of the county in this state where the company's principal office is or, if it has no principal office in this state, Salt Lake County.

(2)  It is not necessary to make any member or manager a party to a proceeding to dissolve a company unless relief is sought against them personally.

(3)  A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a company may:

(a)  issue an injunction;

(b)  appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs;

(c)  take other action required to preserve the company's assets wherever located; and

(d)  carry on the business of the company until a full hearing can be held.



Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

